Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

[§671D-1] Short title. This chapter
may be cited as the Hawaii Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1989. [L
1989, c 354, pt of §3 and c 363, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next